hunspell-lij/lij_IT.aff
# Diçionäio ligure (zeneise)
#
# Copyright © 2019-2026 Jean Maillard
#
# Email: jean (at) maillard (at) it
#
# This file is distributed under the MIT license.

NAME Diçionäio ligure (zeneise)
LANG lij_IT
HOME https://conseggio-ligure.org/
VERSION 26.0921
SET UTF-8

KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm
TRY AÀÂÄÆBCÇDEÉÈÊËFGHIÌÎÏLMNÑOÓÒÔÖPQRSTUÙÛÜVXZJKWYaàâäæbcçdeéèêëfghiìîïlmnñoóòôöpqrstuùûüvxzjkwy
WORDCHARS '’-0123456789ºª°

MAP 10
MAP aâäAÂÄ
MAP cçCÇ
MAP çsÇs
MAP szSZ
MAP eéèêëEÉÈÊË
MAP è(ae)æÈ(AE)(Ae)Æ
MAP iìîïIÌÎÏ
MAP oóòôöOÓÒÔÖ
MAP uùûüUÙÛÜ
MAP (eu)öø(EU)(Eu)ÖØ

REP 38
REP á à
REP b bb
REP bb b
REP c cc
REP cc c
REP d dd
REP dd d
REP f ff
REP ff f
REP g gg
REP gg g
REP gl gg
REP í ì
REP l ll
REP ll l
REP m mm
REP mm m
REP n nn
REP nb mb
REP nn n
REP np mp
REP p pp
REP pp p
REP r rr
REP rr r
REP s ss
REP si sci
REP ss s
REP t tt
REP tt t
REP ú ù
REP v vv
REP vv v
REP z zz
REP zi çi
REP zz z
REP zion çion
REP nn- ñ

FLAG long

FORBIDDENWORD **
NEEDAFFIX ~~
SUBSTANDARD --
NOSUGGEST !!

# Accent conversion inputs are intentionally decomposed (NFD).
ICONV 47
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ° º
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV à à
ICONV â â
ICONV ä ä
ICONV é é
ICONV è è
ICONV ê ê
ICONV ë ë
ICONV ì ì
ICONV î î
ICONV ï ï
ICONV ñ ñ
ICONV ó ó
ICONV ò ò
ICONV ô ô
ICONV ö ö
ICONV ù ù
ICONV û û
ICONV ü ü
ICONV ÿ ÿ
ICONV ç ç
ICONV À À
ICONV Â Â
ICONV Ä Ä
ICONV É É
ICONV È È
ICONV Ê Ê
ICONV Ë Ë
ICONV Ì Ì
ICONV Î Î
ICONV Ï Ï
ICONV Ñ Ñ
ICONV Ó Ó
ICONV Ò Ò
ICONV Ô Ô
ICONV Ö Ö
ICONV Ù Ù
ICONV Û Û
ICONV Ü Ü
ICONV Ÿ Ÿ
ICONV Ç Ç

OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’

COMPOUNDMIN 1
COMPOUNDWORDMAX 7
ONLYINCOMPOUND nY
MAXCPDSUGS 0

COMPOUNDRULE 129
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(nc)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (n4)(nX)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(nZ)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n4)(nV)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(na)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n4)(nW)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)
COMPOUNDRULE (n7)(n6)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(nb)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n0)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n1)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(nc)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n4)(nX)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(nZ)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n4)(nV)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(na)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n4)(nW)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(nb)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n0)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n1)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(nc)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n4)(nX)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(nZ)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n4)(nV)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(na)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n4)(nW)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(nb)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n0)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n1)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(nc)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n4)(nX)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(nZ)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n4)(nV)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(na)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n4)(nW)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(nb)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n0)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n1)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(nd)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(nc)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(n2)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n4)(nX)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(nZ)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n4)(nV)(nf)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(na)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n4)(nW)(ne)
COMPOUNDRULE (nH)(nL)
COMPOUNDRULE (nI)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nJ)(nN)
COMPOUNDRULE (nK)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nK)(nL)
COMPOUNDRULE (n8)(n9)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (n8)(n9)(nL)
COMPOUNDRULE (nA)(nB)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nA)(nB)(nL)
COMPOUNDRULE (nC)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nD)(nE)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nF)(nG)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nD)(nT)
COMPOUNDRULE (nF)(nU)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nD)(nE)(n9)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nF)(nG)(n9)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nD)(na)(nB)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nF)(nW)(nB)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (nP)(nM)
COMPOUNDRULE (ng)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(nk)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(nl)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n4)(nm)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(nZ)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n4)(nV)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n3)(na)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n4)(nW)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(nh)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n0)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n1)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(nk)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(nl)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n4)(nm)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(nZ)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n4)(nV)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n3)(na)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (nS)(n4)(nW)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(nh)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n0)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n1)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(nk)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(nl)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n4)(nm)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(nZ)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n4)(nV)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n3)(na)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n5)(n6)(n4)(nW)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(nh)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n0)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n1)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(nk)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(nl)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n4)(nm)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(nZ)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n4)(nV)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n3)(na)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n0)(nQ)(n6)(n4)(nW)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(nh)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n0)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n1)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(nk)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(nl)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n4)(nm)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(nZ)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n4)(nV)(ni)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n3)(na)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (n1)(nR)(n6)(n4)(nW)(nj)(nn)
COMPOUNDRULE (rM)?(rH)?(rT)?(rU)?
COMPOUNDRULE (dG)*(dO)

SFX 11 Y 5
SFX 11 0 0/1'E' o
SFX 11 o a/3'L' o
SFX 11 o an/6'E' o
SFX 11 o an/6'E' o
SFX 11 o a/E2 o

SFX 14 Y 81
SFX 14 0 0/4'E' emmo
SFX 14 emmo emo/4'E' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æ/5'E' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iæ/5'E' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo æ/5'E' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo ava/1'E' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iava/1'E' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo ava/1'E' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo avo/1'E'-- [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iavo/1'E'-- [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo avo/1'E'-- hemmo
SFX 14 emmo avi/2' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iavi/2' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo avi/2' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo ava/3'L' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iava/3'L' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo ava/3'L' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo avimo/4'E' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iavimo/4'E' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo avimo/4'E' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo avi/5'E' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iavi/5'E' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo avi/5'E' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo avan/6'E' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iavan/6'E' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo avan/6'E' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo iò/1'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iö/1'E'-- [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo ò/1'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iæ/2' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æ/2' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo ià/3'L' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iâ/3'L'-- [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo à/3'L' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo ä/3'L'-- iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iemo/4'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo emo/4'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iei/5'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo ei/5'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo ian/6'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo an/6'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo emmo/4'E' emmo
SFX 14 emmo emo/4'E' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æ/5'E' [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iæ/5'E' [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo æ/5'E' hemmo
SFX 14 emmo esse/1'E' emmo
SFX 14 emmo esci/2' emmo
SFX 14 emmo esse/3'L' emmo
SFX 14 emmo escimo/4'E' emmo
SFX 14 emmo esci/5'E' emmo
SFX 14 emmo essan/6'E' emmo
SFX 14 emmo ieiva/1'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo eiva/1'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iæ/1'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æ/1'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iësci/2' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo ësci/2' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo ieiva/3'L' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo eiva/3'L' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iæ/3'L' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æ/3'L' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iëscimo/4'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo ëscimo/4'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iësci/5'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo ësci/5'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo ieivan/6'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo eivan/6'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo iæn/6'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æn/6'E' iemmo
SFX 14 emmo emmo/ENETES emmo
SFX 14 emmo emo/ENETES [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]emmo
SFX 14 emmo æ/ENEMEV [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iæ/ENEMEV [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo æ/ENEMEV hemmo
SFX 14 emmo ando/ENEMETEVES [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iando/ENEMETEVES [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo ando/ENEMETEVES hemmo
SFX 14 emmo â/O'ENEMETEVES [^cgh]emmo
SFX 14 emmo iâ/O'ENEMETEVES [cg]emmo
SFX 14 hemmo â/O'ENEMETEVES hemmo

SFX 21 Y 51
SFX 21 0 0/1'E' o
SFX 21 o i/2' o
SFX 21 o e/3'L' o
SFX 21 o emmo/4'E' o
SFX 21 o ei/5'E' o
SFX 21 o an/6'E' o
SFX 21 o eiva/1'E' o
SFX 21 o eivo/1'E'-- o
SFX 21 o eivi/2' o
SFX 21 o eiva/3'L' o
SFX 21 o eivimo/4'E' o
SFX 21 o eivi/5'E' o
SFX 21 o eivan/6'E' o
SFX 21 o iò/1'E' o
SFX 21 o iö/1'E'-- o
SFX 21 o iæ/2' o
SFX 21 o ià/3'L' o
SFX 21 o iâ/3'L'-- o
SFX 21 o iemo/4'E' o
SFX 21 o iei/5'E' o
SFX 21 o ian/6'E' o
SFX 21 o e/1'E' o
SFX 21 o i/2' o
SFX 21 o e/3'L' o
SFX 21 o emmo/4'E' o
SFX 21 o ei/5'E' o
SFX 21 o an/6'E' o
SFX 21 o esse/1'E' o
SFX 21 o esci/2' o
SFX 21 o esse/3'L' o
SFX 21 o escimo/4'E' o
SFX 21 o esci/5'E' o
SFX 21 o essan/6'E' o
SFX 21 o ieiva/1'E' o
SFX 21 o iæ/1'E' o
SFX 21 o iësci/2' o
SFX 21 o ieiva/3'L' o
SFX 21 o iæ/3'L' o
SFX 21 o iëscimo/4'E' o
SFX 21 o iësci/5'E' o
SFX 21 o ieivan/6'E' o
SFX 21 o iæn/6'E' o
SFX 21 o i/ENEMET o
SFX 21 o emmo/ENETES o
SFX 21 o ei/ENEMEV o
SFX 21 o endo/ENEMETEVES o
SFX 21 o ei/O'ENEMETEVES o
SFX 21 o uo o
SFX 21 o ua o
SFX 21 o ui o
SFX 21 o ue o

SFX 31 Y 35
SFX 31 0 0/1'E' o
SFX 31 o i/2' [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o hi/2' [cg]o
SFX 31 io i/2' [cg]io
SFX 31 o i/2' [^cg]io
SFX 31 o e/3'L' [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o he/3'L' [cg]o
SFX 31 io e/3'L' [cg]io
SFX 31 o e/3'L' [^cg]io
SFX 31 o an/6'E' o
SFX 31 o e/1'E' [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o he/1'E' [cg]o
SFX 31 io e/1'E' [cg]io
SFX 31 o e/1'E' [^cg]io
SFX 31 o i/2' [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o hi/2' [cg]o
SFX 31 io i/2' [cg]io
SFX 31 o i/2' [^cg]io
SFX 31 o e/3'L' [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o he/3'L' [cg]o
SFX 31 io e/3'L' [cg]io
SFX 31 o e/3'L' [^cg]io
SFX 31 o an/6'E' o
SFX 31 o i/ENEMET [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o hi/ENEMET [cg]o
SFX 31 io i/ENEMET [cg]io
SFX 31 o i/ENEMET [^cg]io
SFX 31 o e/O' [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o he/O' [cg]o
SFX 31 io e/O' [cg]io
SFX 31 o e/O' [^cg]io
SFX 31 o i/O'ENEMETEVES~~ [^cgi]o
SFX 31 o hi/O'ENEMETEVES~~ [cg]o
SFX 31 io i/O'ENEMETEVES~~ [cg]io
SFX 31 o i/O'ENEMETEVES~~ [^cg]io

SFX 34 Y 57
SFX 34 0 0/4'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo emo/4'E' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ei/5'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo eiva/1'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo eivo/1'E'-- emmo
SFX 34 emmo eivi/2' emmo
SFX 34 emmo eiva/3'L' emmo
SFX 34 emmo eivimo/4'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo eivi/5'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo eivan/6'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo iò/1'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo iö/1'E'-- [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ò/1'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo ö/1'E'-- iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iæ/2' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo æ/2' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo ià/3'L' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo iâ/3'L'-- [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo à/3'L' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo ä/3'L'-- iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iemo/4'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo emo/4'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iei/5'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ei/5'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo ian/6'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo an/6'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo emmo/4'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo emo/4'E' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ei/5'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo esse/1'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo esci/2' emmo
SFX 34 emmo esse/3'L' emmo
SFX 34 emmo escimo/4'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo esci/5'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo essan/6'E' emmo
SFX 34 emmo ieiva/1'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo eiva/1'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iæ/1'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo æ/1'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iësci/2' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ësci/2' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo ieiva/3'L' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo eiva/3'L' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iæ/3'L' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo æ/3'L' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iëscimo/4'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ëscimo/4'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iësci/5'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ësci/5'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo ieivan/6'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo eivan/6'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo iæn/6'E' [^i]emmo
SFX 34 emmo æn/6'E' iemmo
SFX 34 emmo emmo/ENETES emmo
SFX 34 emmo emo/ENETES [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]emmo
SFX 34 emmo ei/ENEMEV emmo
SFX 34 emmo endo/ENEMETEVES emmo
